Colorado, session 2026A, HB1307.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-105, amend (5)
as follows:
12-240-105. Colorado medical board - immunity - subject to
review - repeal of article.
(5) This article 240 is repealed, effective September 1, 2026 2035.
Before the repeal, this article 240, including an analysis of physician
responsibilities related to recommendations for medical marijuana and the
provisions of section 25-1.5-106, are IS scheduled for review in accordance
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

with section 24-34-104.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-107, add (3)(z)
as follows:
12-240-107. Practice of medicine defined - exemptions from
licensing requirements - unauthorized practice by physician assistants
and anesthesiologist assistants - penalties - definitions - rules.
(3) A person may engage in, and shall not be required to obtain a
license or a physician training license under this article 240 with respect to,
any of the following acts:
(z) THE FACILITATION OF NATURAL MEDICINE SERVICES WITHIN THE
SCOPE OF THE NATURAL MEDICINE FACILITATOR LICENSE BY AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO IS LICENSED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 170 OF THIS TITLE 12 TO PERFORM
AND SUPERVISE NATURAL MEDICINE SERVICES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-111, amend (2)
and (3) as follows:
12-240-111. Distinguished foreign teaching physician license -
qualifications - rules.
(2) An applicant who meets the qualifications and conditions set
forth in subsection (1) of this section but is not offered the rank of associate
professor or higher may be granted a temporary license for one year only,
to practice medicine in this state as a member of the academic faculty at the
discretion of the board and in the manner determined by the board. If the
applicant is granted a temporary license, he or she THEY shall practice only
under the direct supervision of a person A MEMBER OF THE ACADEMIC
FACULTY who has the rank of associate professor or higher.
(3) A distinguished foreign teaching physician license is effective
and in force only while the holder is serving on the academic staff of a
medical school. The A license expires one year after the date of issuance
and may be renewed annually ISSUED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OR (2)
OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWAL PROVISIONS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 12-20-202 (1) AND MAY BE RENEWED only after the board has
specifically determined that the conditions specified in subsection (1) or (2)
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1307

of this section will continue during the ensuing period of licensure. The
board may require an applicant for licensure under this section to present
himself or herself THEMSELF to the board for an interview. The board may
withdraw licensure granted under this section prior to the expiration of the
license IF THE LICENSE HOLDER IS NO LONGER SERVING ON THE ACADEMIC
STAFF OF A MEDICAL SCHOOL OR for unprofessional conduct as defined in
section 12-240-121.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-116, add (1)(d)
as follows:
12-240-116. Licensing panel.
(1) (d) THE PRESIDENT MAY SERVE AS A FULL MEMBER OF THE
LICENSING PANEL AT LICENSING PANEL MEETINGS.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 12-240-119.5 as
follows:
12-240-119.5. Administrative license - qualifications - exemption
from continuing medical education requirements - board rules.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS ARTICLE 240, ON
AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE BOARD MAY ISSUE TO A PHYSICIAN AN
ADMINISTRATIVE LICENSE THAT LIMITS THE PHYSICIAN'S MEDICAL PRACTICE
TO ONLY ADMINISTRATIVE ACTIVITIES, AS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF
THIS SECTION, IF THE PHYSICIAN:
(a) HOLDS OR HELD AN UNRESTRICTED LICENSE TO PRACTICE
MEDICINE IN THIS STATE OR MEETS ANY OTHER LICENSING REQUIREMENTS AS
DETERMINED BY THE BOARD BY RULE;
(b) PAYS THE FEE ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-20-105;
AND
(c) SATISFIES ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
BOARD BY RULE OR STIPULATION.
(2) SUBJECT TO THE PROHIBITIONS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (3) OF
THIS SECTION, A PHYSICIAN HOLDING AN ADMINISTRATIVE LICENSE MAY:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1307

(a) ENGAGE IN EVIDENCE-BASED PROTOCOL DESIGN;
(b) PARTICIPATE IN ACTIVITIES RELATED TO QUALITY MANAGEMENT;
(c) DEVELOP PATIENT SAFETY PROTOCOLS;
(d) DESIGN OR ANALYZE RESEARCH;
(e) ENGAGE IN TEACHING OR INSTRUCTION OF A MEDICAL STUDENT,
RESIDENT, OR FELLOW THAT DOES NOT INVOLVE DIRECT PATIENT CARE,
INCLUDING TEACHING OR INSTRUCTION ACTIVITIES SUCH AS CURRICULUM
MANAGEMENT; MENTORSHIP; PARTICIPATION IN TEAM-BASED DISCUSSIONS;
EVALUATION OF DIAGNOSTIC DECISION-MAKING, CLINICAL REASONING, OR
PATIENT PRIORITIZATION; OR PROVIDING FEEDBACK; OR
(f) ENGAGE IN ANY OTHER ACTIVITY APPROVED BY THE BOARD BY
RULE OR STIPULATION.
(3) A PHYSICIAN PRACTICING UNDER AN ADMINISTRATIVE LICENSE
IS PROHIBITED FROM ENGAGING IN NONADMINISTRATIVE ASPECTS OF
MEDICAL PRACTICE, INCLUDING:
(a) PATIENT CONTACT, INCLUDING THE ASSESSMENT OF A PATIENT'S
MEDICAL HISTORY OR CURRENT MEDICAL CONDITION OR THE PHYSICAL
EXAMINATION OF A PATIENT;
(b) DEVELOPING PATIENT TREATMENT PLANS OR TREATING A
PATIENT;
(c) ORDERING TESTS;
(d) PRESCRIBING; AND
(e) ENGAGING IN ANY OTHER NONADMINISTRATIVE ACTIVITIES,
UNLESS SPECIFICALLY APPROVED BY THE BOARD BY RULE OR STIPULATION.
(4) AN ADMINISTRATIVE LICENSE ISSUED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION
IS SUBJECT TO THE RENEWAL, REINSTATEMENT, AND REACTIVATION
REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH IN SECTION 12-240-130.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1307

(5) A HOLDER OF AN ADMINISTRATIVE LICENSE IS NOT REQUIRED TO
COMPLY WITH CONTINUING MEDICAL EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS SET FORTH
IN SECTION 12-240-130.5.
(6) A HOLDER OF AN ADMINISTRATIVE LICENSE SHALL HAVE MEDICAL
LIABILITY INSURANCE COVERAGE IN THE AMOUNTS REQUIRED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 13-64-302 FOR SERVICES RENDERED IN THIS STATE.
(7) THE BOARD SHALL ADOPT ANY RULES NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER
THE ADMINISTRATIVE LICENSE AND TO REGULATE ADMINISTRATIVE MEDICAL
PRACTICE UNDER THE LICENSE.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(27)(a)(XIV); and add (36)(a)(VIII) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(XIV) The Colorado medical board created in article 240 of title 12;
(36) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2035:
(VIII) THE COLORADO MEDICAL BOARD CREATED IN ARTICLE 240 OF
TITLE 12.
SECTION 7. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1307

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1307